Maryland, session 2025, HB0045.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
SUBTITLE 3A. DENTIST AND DENTAL HYGIENIST INTERSTATE COMPACT.
4–3A–01.
SECTION 1. TITLE AND PURPOSE.
THIS STATUTE SHALL BE KNOWN AND CITED AS THE DENTIST AND DENTAL
HYGIENIST COMPACT. THE PURPOSES OF THIS COMPACT ARE TO FACILITATE THE
INTERSTATE PRACTICE OF DENTISTRY AND DENTAL HYGIENE AND IMPROVE PUBLIC
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0045*

HOUSE BILL 45
ACCESS TO DENTISTRY AND DENTAL HYGIENE SERVICES BY PROVIDING DENTISTS
AND DENTAL HYGIENISTS LICENSED IN A PARTICIPATING STATE THE ABILITY TO
PRACTICE IN PARTICIPATING STATES IN WHICH THEY ARE NOT LICENSED. THE
COMPACT DOES THIS BY ESTABLISHING A PATHWAY FOR DENTISTS AND DENTAL
HYGIENISTS LICENSED IN A PARTICIPATING STATE TO OBTAIN A COMPACT
PRIVILEGE THAT AUTHORIZES THEM TO PRACTICE IN ANOTHER PARTICIPATING
STATE IN WHICH THEY ARE NOT LICENSED. THE COMPACT ENABLES PARTICIPATING
STATES TO PROTECT THE PUBLIC HEALTH AND SAFETY WITH RESPECT TO THE
PRACTICE OF SUCH DENTISTS AND DENTAL HYGIENISTS, THROUGH THE STATE’S
AUTHORITY TO REGULATE THE PRACTICE OF DENTISTRY AND DENTAL HYGIENE IN
THE STATE. THE COMPACT:
(A) ENABLES DENTISTS AND DENTAL HYGIENISTS WHO QUALIFY FOR A
COMPACT PRIVILEGE TO PRACTICE IN OTHER PARTICIPATING STATES WITHOUT
SATISFYING BURDENSOME AND DUPLICATIVE REQUIREMENTS ASSOCIATED WITH
SECURING A LICENSE TO PRACTICE IN THOSE STATES;
(B) PROMOTES MOBILITY AND ADDRESSES WORKFORCE SHORTAGES
THROUGH EACH PARTICIPATING STATE’S ACCEPTANCE OF A COMPACT PRIVILEGE
TO PRACTICE IN THAT STATE;
(C) INCREASES PUBLIC ACCESS TO QUALIFIED, LICENSED DENTISTS AND
DENTAL HYGIENISTS BY CREATING A RESPONSIBLE, STREAMLINED PATHWAY FOR
LICENSEES TO PRACTICE IN PARTICIPATING STATES;
(D) ENHANCES THE ABILITY OF PARTICIPATING STATES TO PROTECT THE
PUBLIC’S HEALTH AND SAFETY;
(E) DOES NOT INTERFERE WITH LICENSURE REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED
BY A PARTICIPATING STATE;
(F) FACILITATES THE SHARING OF LICENSURE AND DISCIPLINARY
INFORMATION AMONG PARTICIPATING STATES;
(G) REQUIRES DENTISTS AND DENTAL HYGIENISTS WHO PRACTICE IN A
PARTICIPATING STATE PURSUANT TO A COMPACT PRIVILEGE TO PRACTICE WITHIN
THE SCOPE OF PRACTICE AUTHORIZED IN THAT STATE;
(H) EXTENDS THE AUTHORITY OF A PARTICIPATING STATE TO REGULATE
THE PRACTICE OF DENTISTRY AND DENTAL HYGIENE WITHIN ITS BORDERS TO
DENTISTS AND DENTAL HYGIENISTS WHO PRACTICE IN THE STATE THROUGH A
COMPACT PRIVILEGE;

HOUSE BILL 45 3
(I) PROMOTES THE COOPERATION OF PARTICIPATING STATES IN
REGULATING THE PRACTICE OF DENTISTRY AND DENTAL HYGIENE WITHIN THOSE
STATES; AND
(J) FACILITATES THE RELOCATION OF MILITARY MEMBERS AND THEIR
SPOUSES WHO ARE LICENSED TO PRACTICE DENTISTRY OR DENTAL HYGIENE.
SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS.
AS USED IN THIS COMPACT, UNLESS THE CONTEXT REQUIRES OTHERWISE,
THE FOLLOWING DEFINITIONS SHALL APPLY:
(A) “ACTIVE MILITARY MEMBER” MEANS ANY PERSON WITH FULL–TIME
DUTY STATUS IN THE ARMED FORCES OF THE UNITED STATES INCLUDING MEMBERS
OF THE NATIONAL GUARD AND RESERVE.
(B) “ADVERSE ACTION” MEANS DISCIPLINARY ACTION OR ENCUMBRANCES
IMPOSED ON A LICENSE OR COMPACT PRIVILEGE BY A STATE LICENSING
AUTHORITY.
(C) “ALTERNATIVE PROGRAM” MEANS A NONDISCIPLINARY MONITORING
OR PRACTICE REMEDIATION PROCESS APPLICABLE TO A DENTIST OR DENTAL
HYGIENIST APPROVED BY A STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY OF A PARTICIPATING
STATE IN WHICH THE DENTIST OR DENTAL HYGIENIST IS LICENSED. THIS INCLUDES,
BUT IS NOT LIMITED TO, PROGRAMS TO WHICH LICENSEES WITH SUBSTANCE ABUSE
OR ADDICTION ISSUES ARE REFERRED IN LIEU OF ADVERSE ACTION.
(D) “CLINICAL ASSESSMENT” MEANS AN EXAMINATION OR PROCESS,
REQUIRED FOR LICENSURE AS A DENTIST OR DENTAL HYGIENIST AS APPLICABLE,
THAT PROVIDES EVIDENCE OF CLINICAL COMPETENCE IN DENTISTRY OR DENTAL
HYGIENE.
(E) “COMMISSIONER” MEANS THE INDIVIDUAL APPOINTED BY A
PARTICIPATING STATE TO SERVE AS THE MEMBER OF THE COMMISSION FOR THAT
PARTICIPATING STATE.
(F) “COMPACT” MEANS THIS DENTIST AND DENTAL HYGIENIST COMPACT.
(G) “COMPACT PRIVILEGE” MEANS THE AUTHORIZATION GRANTED BY THE
REMOTE STATE TO ALLOW A LICENSEE FROM A PARTICIPATING STATE TO PRACTICE
AS A DENTIST OR DENTAL HYGIENIST IN A REMOTE STATE.

HOUSE BILL 45
(H) “CONTINUING PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT” MEANS A REQUIREMENT
AS A CONDITION OF LICENSE RENEWAL TO PROVIDE EVIDENCE OF SUCCESSFUL
PARTICIPATION IN EDUCATIONAL OR PROFESSIONAL ACTIVITIES RELEVANT TO
PRACTICE OR AREA OF WORK.
(I) “CRIMINAL BACKGROUND CHECK” MEANS THE SUBMISSION OF
FINGERPRINTS OR OTHER BIOMETRIC–BASED INFORMATION FOR A LICENSE
APPLICANT FOR THE PURPOSE OF OBTAINING THAT APPLICANT’S CRIMINAL
HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION AS DEFINED IN 28 C.F.R. § 20.3(D) FROM THE
FEDERAL BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION AND THE STATE’S CRIMINAL HISTORY
RECORD REPOSITORY AS DEFINED IN 28 C.F.R. § 20.3(F).
(J) “DATA SYSTEM” MEANS THE COMMISSION’S REPOSITORY OF
INFORMATION ABOUT LICENSEES, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO EXAMINATION,
LICENSURE, INVESTIGATIVE, COMPACT PRIVILEGE, ADVERSE ACTION, AND
ALTERNATIVE PROGRAM.
(K) “DENTAL HYGIENIST” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS LICENSED BY A
STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY TO PRACTICE DENTAL HYGIENE.
(L) “DENTIST” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS LICENSED BY A STATE
LICENSING AUTHORITY TO PRACTICE DENTISTRY.
(M) “DENTIST AND DENTAL HYGIENIST COMPACT COMMISSION” OR
“COMMISSION” MEANS A JOINT GOVERNMENT AGENCY ESTABLISHED BY THIS
COMPACT COMPOSED OF EACH STATE THAT HAS ENACTED THE COMPACT AND A
NATIONAL ADMINISTRATIVE BODY COMPOSED OF A COMMISSIONER FROM EACH
STATE THAT HAS ENACTED THE COMPACT.
(N) “ENCUMBERED LICENSE” MEANS A LICENSE THAT A STATE LICENSING
AUTHORITY HAS LIMITED IN ANY WAY OTHER THAN THROUGH AN ALTERNATIVE
PROGRAM.
(O) “EXECUTIVE BOARD” MEANS THE CHAIR, VICE CHAIR, SECRETARY,
AND TREASURER AND ANY OTHER COMMISSIONERS AS MAY BE DETERMINED BY
COMMISSION RULE OR BYLAW.
(P) “JURISPRUDENCE REQUIREMENT” MEANS THE ASSESSMENT OF AN
INDIVIDUAL’S KNOWLEDGE OF THE LAWS AND RULES GOVERNING THE PRACTICE OF
DENTISTRY OR DENTAL HYGIENE, AS APPLICABLE, IN A STATE.

HOUSE BILL 45 5
(Q) “LICENSE” MEANS CURRENT AUTHORIZATION BY A STATE, OTHER THAN
AUTHORIZATION PURSUANT TO A COMPACT PRIVILEGE, OR OTHER PRIVILEGE, FOR
AN INDIVIDUAL TO PRACTICE AS A DENTIST OR DENTAL HYGIENIST IN THAT STATE.
(R) “LICENSEE” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO HOLDS AN UNRESTRICTED
LICENSE FROM A PARTICIPATING STATE TO PRACTICE AS A DENTIST OR DENTAL
HYGIENIST IN THAT STATE.
(S) “MODEL COMPACT” MEANS THE MODEL FOR THE DENTIST AND
DENTAL HYGIENIST COMPACT ON FILE WITH THE COUNCIL OF STATE
GOVERNMENTS OR OTHER ENTITY AS DESIGNATED BY THE COMMISSION.
(T) “PARTICIPATING STATE” MEANS A STATE THAT HAS ENACTED THE
COMPACT AND BEEN ADMITTED TO THE COMMISSION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
PROVISIONS HEREIN AND COMMISSION RULES.
(U) “QUALIFYING LICENSE” MEANS A LICENSE THAT IS NOT AN
ENCUMBERED LICENSE ISSUED BY A PARTICIPATING STATE TO PRACTICE
DENTISTRY OR DENTAL HYGIENE.
(V) “REMOTE STATE” MEANS A PARTICIPATING STATE WHERE A LICENSEE
WHO IS NOT LICENSED AS A DENTIST OR DENTAL HYGIENIST IS EXERCISING OR
SEEKING TO EXERCISE THE COMPACT PRIVILEGE.
(W) “RULE” MEANS A REGULATION PROMULGATED BY AN ENTITY THAT HAS
THE FORCE OF LAW.
(X) “SCOPE OF PRACTICE” MEANS THE PROCEDURES, ACTIONS, AND
PROCESSES A DENTIST OR DENTAL HYGIENIST LICENSED IN A STATE IS PERMITTED
TO UNDERTAKE IN THAT STATE AND THE CIRCUMSTANCES UNDER WHICH THE
LICENSEE IS PERMITTED TO UNDERTAKE THOSE PROCEDURES, ACTIONS, AND
PROCESSES. SUCH PROCEDURES, ACTIONS, AND PROCESSES AND THE
CIRCUMSTANCES UNDER WHICH THEY MAY BE UNDERTAKEN MAY BE ESTABLISHED
THROUGH MEANS, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO STATUTE, REGULATIONS, CASE
LAW, AND OTHER PROCESSES AVAILABLE TO THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY OR
OTHER GOVERNMENT AGENCY.
(Y) “SIGNIFICANT INVESTIGATIVE INFORMATION” MEANS INFORMATION,
RECORDS, AND DOCUMENTS RECEIVED OR GENERATED BY A STATE LICENSING
AUTHORITY PURSUANT TO AN INVESTIGATION FOR WHICH A DETERMINATION HAS
BEEN MADE THAT THERE IS PROBABLE CAUSE TO BELIEVE THAT THE LICENSEE HAS
VIOLATED A STATUTE OR REGULATION THAT IS CONSIDERED MORE THAN A MINOR

HOUSE BILL 45
INFRACTION FOR WHICH THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY COULD PURSUE
ADVERSE ACTION AGAINST THE LICENSEE.
(Z) “STATE” MEANS ANY STATE, COMMONWEALTH, DISTRICT, OR
TERRITORY OF THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA THAT REGULATES THE PRACTICES
OF DENTISTRY AND DENTAL HYGIENE.
(AA) “STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY” MEANS AN AGENCY OR OTHER ENTITY
OF A STATE THAT IS RESPONSIBLE FOR THE LICENSING AND REGULATION OF
DENTISTS OR DENTAL HYGIENISTS.
SECTION 3. STATE PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT.
(A) IN ORDER TO JOIN THE COMPACT AND THEREAFTER CONTINUE AS A
PARTICIPATING STATE, A STATE MUST:
(1) ENACT A COMPACT THAT IS NOT MATERIALLY DIFFERENT FROM
THE MODEL COMPACT AS DETERMINED IN ACCORDANCE WITH COMMISSION RULES;
(2) PARTICIPATE FULLY IN THE COMMISSION’S DATA SYSTEM;
(3) HAVE A MECHANISM IN PLACE FOR RECEIVING AND
INVESTIGATING COMPLAINTS ABOUT ITS LICENSEES AND LICENSE APPLICANTS;
(4) NOTIFY THE COMMISSION, IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE TERMS OF
THE COMPACT AND COMMISSION RULES, OF ANY ADVERSE ACTION OR THE
AVAILABILITY OF SIGNIFICANT INVESTIGATIVE INFORMATION REGARDING A
LICENSEE AND LICENSE APPLICANT;
(5) FULLY IMPLEMENT A CRIMINAL BACKGROUND CHECK
REQUIREMENT, WITHIN A TIME FRAME ESTABLISHED BY COMMISSION RULE, BY
RECEIVING THE RESULTS OF A QUALIFYING CRIMINAL BACKGROUND CHECK;
(6) COMPLY WITH THE COMMISSION RULES APPLICABLE TO A
PARTICIPATING STATE;
(7) ACCEPT THE NATIONAL BOARD EXAMINATIONS OF THE JOINT
COMMISSION ON NATIONAL DENTAL EXAMINATIONS OR ANOTHER EXAMINATION
ACCEPTED BY COMMISSION RULE AS A LICENSURE EXAMINATION;
(8) ACCEPT FOR LICENSURE THAT APPLICANTS FOR A DENTIST
LICENSE GRADUATE FROM A PREDOCTORAL DENTAL EDUCATION PROGRAM
ACCREDITED BY THE COMMISSION ON DENTAL ACCREDITATION OR ANOTHER

HOUSE BILL 45 7
ACCREDITING AGENCY RECOGNIZED BY THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF
EDUCATION FOR THE ACCREDITATION OF DENTISTRY AND DENTAL HYGIENE
EDUCATION PROGRAMS, LEADING TO THE DOCTOR OF DENTAL SURGERY (D.D.S.)
OR DOCTOR OF DENTAL MEDICINE (D.M.D.) DEGREE;
(9) ACCEPT FOR LICENSURE THAT APPLICANTS FOR A DENTAL
HYGIENIST LICENSE GRADUATE FROM A DENTAL HYGIENE EDUCATION PROGRAM
ACCREDITED BY THE COMMISSION ON DENTAL ACCREDITATION OR ANOTHER
ACCREDITING AGENCY RECOGNIZED BY THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF
EDUCATION FOR THE ACCREDITATION OF DENTISTRY AND DENTAL HYGIENE
PROGRAMS;
(10) REQUIRE FOR LICENSURE THAT APPLICANTS SUCCESSFULLY
COMPLETE A CLINICAL ASSESSMENT;
(11) HAVE CONTINUING PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT
REQUIREMENTS AS A CONDITION FOR LICENSE RENEWAL; AND
(12) PAY A PARTICIPATION FEE TO THE COMMISSION AS ESTABLISHED
BY COMMISSION RULE.
(B) PROVIDING ALTERNATIVE PATHWAYS FOR AN INDIVIDUAL TO OBTAIN
AN UNRESTRICTED LICENSE DOES NOT DISQUALIFY A STATE FROM PARTICIPATING
IN THE COMPACT.
(C) WHEN CONDUCTING A CRIMINAL BACKGROUND CHECK, THE STATE
LICENSING AUTHORITY SHALL:
(1) CONSIDER THAT INFORMATION IN MAKING A LICENSURE
DECISION;
(2) MAINTAIN DOCUMENTATION OF COMPLETION OF THE CRIMINAL
BACKGROUND CHECK AND BACKGROUND CHECK INFORMATION TO THE EXTENT
ALLOWED BY STATE AND FEDERAL LAW; AND
(3) REPORT TO THE COMMISSION WHETHER IT HAS COMPLETED THE
CRIMINAL BACKGROUND CHECK AND WHETHER THE INDIVIDUAL WAS GRANTED OR
DENIED A LICENSE.
(D) A LICENSEE OF A PARTICIPATING STATE WHO HAS A QUALIFYING
LICENSE IN THAT STATE AND DOES NOT HOLD AN ENCUMBERED LICENSE IN ANY
OTHER PARTICIPATING STATE SHALL BE ISSUED A COMPACT PRIVILEGE IN A
REMOTE STATE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE TERMS OF THE COMPACT AND

HOUSE BILL 45
COMMISSION RULES. IF A REMOTE STATE HAS A JURISPRUDENCE REQUIREMENT A
COMPACT PRIVILEGE WILL NOT BE ISSUED TO THE LICENSEE UNLESS THE LICENSEE
HAS SATISFIED THE JURISPRUDENCE REQUIREMENT.
SECTION 4. COMPACT PRIVILEGE.
(A) TO OBTAIN AND EXERCISE THE COMPACT PRIVILEGE UNDER THE TERMS
AND PROVISIONS OF THE COMPACT, THE LICENSEE SHALL:
(1) HAVE A QUALIFYING LICENSE AS A DENTIST OR DENTAL
HYGIENIST IN A PARTICIPATING STATE;
(2) BE ELIGIBLE FOR A COMPACT PRIVILEGE IN ANY REMOTE STATE
IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTIONS (D), (G), AND (H) OF THIS SECTION;
(3) SUBMIT TO AN APPLICATION PROCESS WHENEVER THE LICENSEE
IS SEEKING THE COMPACT PRIVILEGE WITHIN A REMOTE STATE;
(4) PAY ANY APPLICABLE COMMISSION AND REMOTE STATE FEES
FOR A COMPACT PRIVILEGE IN THE REMOTE STATE;
(5) MEET ANY JURISPRUDENCE REQUIREMENT ESTABLISHED BY A
REMOTE STATE IN WHICH THE LICENSEE IS SEEKING A COMPACT PRIVILEGE;
(6) HAVE PASSED A NATIONAL BOARD EXAMINATION OF THE JOINT
COMMISSION ON NATIONAL DENTAL EXAMINATIONS OR ANOTHER EXAMINATION
ACCEPTED BY COMMISSION RULE;
(7) FOR A DENTIST, HAVE GRADUATED FROM A PREDOCTORAL
DENTAL EDUCATION PROGRAM ACCREDITED BY THE COMMISSION ON DENTAL
ACCREDITATION OR ANOTHER ACCREDITING AGENCY RECOGNIZED BY THE UNITED
STATES DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION FOR THE ACCREDITATION OF DENTISTRY
AND DENTAL HYGIENE EDUCATION PROGRAMS, LEADING TO THE DOCTOR OF
DENTAL SURGERY (D.D.S.) OR DOCTOR OF DENTAL MEDICINE (D.M.D.) DEGREE;
(8) FOR A DENTAL HYGIENIST, HAVE GRADUATED FROM A DENTAL
HYGIENE EDUCATION PROGRAM ACCREDITED BY THE COMMISSION ON DENTAL
ACCREDITATION OR ANOTHER ACCREDITING AGENCY RECOGNIZED BY THE UNITED
STATES DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION FOR THE ACCREDITATION OF DENTISTRY
AND DENTAL HYGIENE EDUCATION PROGRAMS;
(9) HAVE SUCCESSFULLY COMPLETED A CLINICAL ASSESSMENT FOR
LICENSURE;

HOUSE BILL 45 9
(10) REPORT TO THE COMMISSION ADVERSE ACTION TAKEN BY ANY
NONPARTICIPATING STATE WHEN APPLYING FOR A COMPACT PRIVILEGE AND
OTHERWISE WITHIN THIRTY (30) DAYS FROM THE DATE THE ADVERSE ACTION IS
TAKEN;
(11) REPORT TO THE COMMISSION WHEN APPLYING FOR A COMPACT
PRIVILEGE THE ADDRESS OF THE LICENSEE’S PRIMARY RESIDENCE AND
THEREAFTER IMMEDIATELY REPORT TO THE COMMISSION ANY CHANGE IN THE
ADDRESS OF THE LICENSEE’S PRIMARY RESIDENCE; AND
(12) CONSENT TO ACCEPT SERVICE OF PROCESS BY MAIL AT THE
LICENSEE’S PRIMARY RESIDENCE ON RECORD WITH THE COMMISSION WITH
RESPECT TO ANY ACTION BROUGHT AGAINST THE LICENSEE BY THE COMMISSION
OR A PARTICIPATING STATE, AND CONSENT TO ACCEPT SERVICE OF A SUBPOENA BY
MAIL AT THE LICENSEE’S PRIMARY RESIDENCE ON RECORD WITH THE COMMISSION
WITH RESPECT TO ANY ACTION BROUGHT OR INVESTIGATION CONDUCTED BY THE
COMMISSION OR A PARTICIPATING STATE.
(B) THE LICENSEE MUST COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION TO MAINTAIN THE COMPACT PRIVILEGE IN THE
REMOTE STATE. IF THOSE REQUIREMENTS ARE MET, THE COMPACT PRIVILEGE WILL
CONTINUE AS LONG AS THE LICENSEE MAINTAINS A QUALIFYING LICENSE IN THE
STATE THROUGH WHICH THE LICENSEE APPLIED FOR THE COMPACT PRIVILEGE AND
PAYS ANY APPLICABLE COMPACT PRIVILEGE RENEWAL FEES.
(C) A LICENSEE PROVIDING DENTISTRY OR DENTAL HYGIENE IN A REMOTE
STATE UNDER THE COMPACT PRIVILEGE SHALL FUNCTION WITHIN THE SCOPE OF
PRACTICE AUTHORIZED BY THE REMOTE STATE FOR A DENTIST OR DENTAL
HYGIENIST LICENSED IN THAT STATE.
(D) A LICENSEE PROVIDING DENTISTRY OR DENTAL HYGIENE PURSUANT TO
A COMPACT PRIVILEGE IN A REMOTE STATE IS SUBJECT TO THAT STATE’S
REGULATORY AUTHORITY. A REMOTE STATE MAY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH DUE
PROCESS AND THAT STATE’S LAWS, BY ADVERSE ACTION, REVOKE OR REMOVE A
LICENSEE’S COMPACT PRIVILEGE IN THE REMOTE STATE FOR A SPECIFIC PERIOD
OF TIME AND IMPOSE FINES OR TAKE ANY OTHER NECESSARY ACTIONS TO PROTECT
THE HEALTH AND SAFETY OF ITS CITIZENS. IF A REMOTE STATE IMPOSES AN
ADVERSE ACTION AGAINST A COMPACT PRIVILEGE THAT LIMITS THE COMPACT
PRIVILEGE, THAT ADVERSE ACTION APPLIES TO ALL COMPACT PRIVILEGES IN ALL
REMOTE STATES. A LICENSEE WHOSE COMPACT PRIVILEGE IN A REMOTE STATE IS
REMOVED FOR A SPECIFIED PERIOD OF TIME IS NOT ELIGIBLE FOR A COMPACT
PRIVILEGE IN ANY OTHER REMOTE STATE UNTIL THE SPECIFIC TIME FOR REMOVAL

HOUSE BILL 45
OF THE COMPACT PRIVILEGE HAS PASSED AND ALL ENCUMBRANCE REQUIREMENTS
ARE SATISFIED.
(E) IF A LICENSE IN A PARTICIPATING STATE IS AN ENCUMBERED LICENSE,
THE LICENSEE SHALL LOSE THE COMPACT PRIVILEGE IN A REMOTE STATE AND
SHALL NOT BE ELIGIBLE FOR A COMPACT PRIVILEGE IN ANY REMOTE STATE UNTIL
THE LICENSE IS NO LONGER ENCUMBERED.
(F) ONCE AN ENCUMBERED LICENSE IN A PARTICIPATING STATE IS
RESTORED TO GOOD STANDING, THE LICENSEE MUST MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION TO OBTAIN A COMPACT PRIVILEGE IN A REMOTE
STATE.
(G) IF A LICENSEE’S COMPACT PRIVILEGE IN A REMOTE STATE IS REMOVED
BY THE REMOTE STATE, THE INDIVIDUAL SHALL LOSE OR BE INELIGIBLE FOR THE
COMPACT PRIVILEGE IN ANY REMOTE STATE UNTIL THE FOLLOWING OCCUR:
(1) THE SPECIFIC PERIOD OF TIME FOR WHICH THE COMPACT
PRIVILEGE WAS REMOVED HAS ENDED; AND
(2) ALL CONDITIONS FOR REMOVAL OF THE COMPACT PRIVILEGE
HAVE BEEN SATISFIED.
(H) ONCE THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION HAVE
BEEN MET, THE LICENSEE MUST MEET THE REQUIREMENTS IN SUBSECTION (A) OF
THIS SECTION TO OBTAIN A COMPACT PRIVILEGE IN A REMOTE STATE.
SECTION 5. ACTIVE MILITARY MEMBER PERSONNEL OR THEIR
SPOUSES.
AN ACTIVE MILITARY MEMBER AND THEIR SPOUSE SHALL NOT BE REQUIRED
TO PAY TO THE COMMISSION FOR A COMPACT PRIVILEGE THE FEE OTHERWISE
CHARGED BY THE COMMISSION. IF A REMOTE STATE CHOOSES TO CHARGE A FEE
FOR A COMPACT PRIVILEGE, IT MAY CHOOSE TO CHARGE A REDUCED FEE OR NO FEE
TO AN ACTIVE MILITARY MEMBER AND THEIR SPOUSE FOR A COMPACT PRIVILEGE.
SECTION 6. ADVERSE ACTIONS.
(A) A PARTICIPATING STATE IN WHICH A LICENSEE IS LICENSED SHALL
HAVE EXCLUSIVE AUTHORITY TO IMPOSE ADVERSE ACTION AGAINST THE
QUALIFYING LICENSE ISSUED BY THAT PARTICIPATING STATE.

HOUSE BILL 45 11
(B) A PARTICIPATING STATE MAY TAKE ADVERSE ACTION BASED ON THE
SIGNIFICANT INVESTIGATIVE INFORMATION OF A REMOTE STATE, SO LONG AS THE
PARTICIPATING STATE FOLLOWS ITS OWN PROCEDURES FOR IMPOSING ADVERSE
ACTION.
(C) NOTHING IN THIS COMPACT SHALL OVERRIDE A PARTICIPATING
STATE’S DECISION THAT PARTICIPATION IN AN ALTERNATIVE PROGRAM MAY BE
USED IN LIEU OF ADVERSE ACTION AND THAT SUCH PARTICIPATION SHALL REMAIN
NONPUBLIC IF REQUIRED BY THE PARTICIPATING STATE’S LAWS. PARTICIPATING
STATES MUST REQUIRE LICENSEES WHO ENTER ANY ALTERNATIVE PROGRAM IN
LIEU OF DISCIPLINE TO AGREE NOT TO PRACTICE PURSUANT TO A COMPACT
PRIVILEGE IN ANY OTHER PARTICIPATING STATE DURING THE TERM OF THE
ALTERNATIVE PROGRAM WITHOUT PRIOR AUTHORIZATION FROM SUCH OTHER
PARTICIPATING STATE.
(D) ANY PARTICIPATING STATE IN WHICH A LICENSEE IS APPLYING TO
PRACTICE OR IS PRACTICING PURSUANT TO A COMPACT PRIVILEGE MAY
INVESTIGATE ACTUAL OR ALLEGED VIOLATIONS OF THE STATUTES AND
REGULATIONS AUTHORIZING THE PRACTICE OF DENTISTRY OR DENTAL HYGIENE IN
ANY OTHER PARTICIPATING STATE IN WHICH THE DENTIST OR DENTAL HYGIENIST
HOLDS A LICENSE OR COMPACT PRIVILEGE.
(E) A REMOTE STATE SHALL HAVE THE AUTHORITY TO:
(1) TAKE ADVERSE ACTIONS AS SET FORTH IN SECTION 4(D) OF THIS
COMPACT AGAINST A LICENSEE’S COMPACT PRIVILEGE IN THE STATE;
(2) IN FURTHERANCE OF ITS RIGHTS AND RESPONSIBILITIES UNDER
THE COMPACT AND THE COMMISSION’S RULES, ISSUE SUBPOENAS FOR BOTH
HEARINGS AND INVESTIGATIONS THAT REQUIRE THE ATTENDANCE AND TESTIMONY
OF WITNESSES AND THE PRODUCTION OF EVIDENCE. SUBPOENAS ISSUED BY A
STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY IN A PARTICIPATING STATE FOR THE ATTENDANCE
AND TESTIMONY OF WITNESSES, OR THE PRODUCTION OF EVIDENCE FROM
ANOTHER PARTICIPATING STATE, SHALL BE ENFORCED IN THE LATTER STATE BY
ANY COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION, ACCORDING TO THE PRACTICE AND
PROCEDURE OF THAT COURT APPLICABLE TO SUBPOENAS ISSUED IN PROCEEDINGS
PENDING BEFORE IT. THE ISSUING AUTHORITY SHALL PAY ANY WITNESS FEES,
TRAVEL EXPENSES, MILEAGE, AND OTHER FEES REQUIRED BY THE SERVICE
STATUTES OF THE STATE WHERE THE WITNESSES OR EVIDENCE IS LOCATED; AND
(3) IF OTHERWISE PERMITTED BY STATE LAW, RECOVER FROM THE
LICENSEE THE COSTS OF INVESTIGATIONS AND DISPOSITION OF CASES RESULTING
FROM ANY ADVERSE ACTION TAKEN AGAINST THAT LICENSEE.

HOUSE BILL 45
(F) (1) IN ADDITION TO THE AUTHORITY GRANTED TO A PARTICIPATING
STATE BY ITS DENTIST OR DENTAL HYGIENIST LICENSURE ACT OR OTHER
APPLICABLE STATE LAW, A PARTICIPATING STATE MAY JOINTLY INVESTIGATE
LICENSEES WITH OTHER PARTICIPATING STATES.
(2) PARTICIPATING STATES SHALL SHARE ANY SIGNIFICANT
INVESTIGATIVE INFORMATION, LITIGATION, OR COMPLIANCE MATERIALS IN
FURTHERANCE OF ANY JOINT OR INDIVIDUAL INVESTIGATION INITIATED UNDER
THE COMPACT.
(G) (1) AFTER A LICENSEE’S COMPACT PRIVILEGE IN A REMOTE STATE IS
TERMINATED, THE REMOTE STATE MAY CONTINUE AN INVESTIGATION OF THE
LICENSEE THAT BEGAN WHEN THE LICENSEE HAD A COMPACT PRIVILEGE IN THAT
REMOTE STATE.
(2) IF THE INVESTIGATION YIELDS WHAT WOULD BE SIGNIFICANT
INVESTIGATIVE INFORMATION HAD THE LICENSEE CONTINUED TO HAVE A COMPACT
PRIVILEGE IN THAT REMOTE STATE, THE REMOTE STATE SHALL REPORT THE
PRESENCE OF SUCH INFORMATION TO THE DATA SYSTEM AS REQUIRED BY SECTION
8(B)(6) OF THIS COMPACT AS IF IT WAS SIGNIFICANT INVESTIGATIVE INFORMATION.
SECTION 7. ESTABLISHMENT AND OPERATION OF THE COMMISSION.
(A) THE COMPACT PARTICIPATING STATES HEREBY CREATE AND
ESTABLISH A JOINT GOVERNMENT AGENCY WHOSE MEMBERSHIP CONSISTS OF ALL
PARTICIPATING STATES THAT HAVE ENACTED THE COMPACT. THE COMMISSION IS
AN INSTRUMENTALITY OF THE PARTICIPATING STATES ACTING JOINTLY AND NOT
AN INSTRUMENTALITY OF ANY ONE STATE. THE COMMISSION SHALL COME INTO
EXISTENCE ON OR AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE COMPACT AS SET FORTH IN
SECTION 11(A) OF THIS COMPACT.
(B) (1) EACH PARTICIPATING STATE SHALL HAVE AND BE LIMITED TO
ONE (1) COMMISSIONER SELECTED BY THAT PARTICIPATING STATE’S STATE
LICENSING AUTHORITY OR, IF THE STATE HAS MORE THAN ONE STATE LICENSING
AUTHORITY, SELECTED COLLECTIVELY BY THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITIES.
(2) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL BE A MEMBER OR DESIGNEE OF SUCH
AUTHORITY OR AUTHORITIES.
(3) THE COMMISSION MAY BY RULE OR BYLAW ESTABLISH A TERM OF
OFFICE FOR COMMISSIONERS AND MAY BY RULE OR BYLAW ESTABLISH TERM
LIMITS.

HOUSE BILL 45 13
(4) THE COMMISSION MAY RECOMMEND TO A STATE LICENSING
AUTHORITY OR AUTHORITIES, AS APPLICABLE, REMOVAL OR SUSPENSION OF AN
INDIVIDUAL AS THE STATE’S COMMISSIONER.
(5) A PARTICIPATING STATE’S STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY OR
AUTHORITIES, AS APPLICABLE, SHALL FILL ANY VACANCY OF ITS COMMISSIONER ON
THE COMMISSION WITHIN SIXTY (60) DAYS OF THE VACANCY.
(6) EACH COMMISSIONER SHALL BE ENTITLED TO ONE VOTE ON ALL
MATTERS THAT ARE VOTED UPON BY THE COMMISSION.
(7) THE COMMISSION SHALL MEET AT LEAST ONCE DURING EACH
CALENDAR YEAR. ADDITIONAL MEETINGS MAY BE HELD AS SET FORTH IN THE
BYLAWS. THE COMMISSION MAY MEET BY TELECOMMUNICATION, VIDEO
CONFERENCE, OR OTHER SIMILAR ELECTRONIC MEANS.
(C) THE COMMISSION SHALL HAVE THE FOLLOWING POWERS:
(1) ESTABLISH THE FISCAL YEAR OF THE COMMISSION;
(2) ESTABLISH A CODE OF CONDUCT AND CONFLICT OF INTEREST
POLICIES;
(3) ADOPT RULES AND BYLAWS;
(4) MAINTAIN ITS FINANCIAL RECORDS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
BYLAWS;
(5) MEET AND TAKE SUCH ACTIONS AS ARE CONSISTENT WITH THE
PROVISIONS OF THIS COMPACT, THE COMMISSION’S RULES, AND THE BYLAWS;
(6) INITIATE AND CONCLUDE LEGAL PROCEEDINGS OR ACTIONS IN
THE NAME OF THE COMMISSION, PROVIDED THAT THE STANDING OF ANY STATE
LICENSING AUTHORITY TO SUE OR BE SUED UNDER APPLICABLE LAW SHALL NOT BE
AFFECTED;
(7) MAINTAIN AND CERTIFY RECORDS AND INFORMATION PROVIDED
TO A PARTICIPATING STATE AS THE AUTHENTICATED BUSINESS RECORDS OF THE
COMMISSION, AND DESIGNATE A PERSON TO DO SO ON THE COMMISSION’S BEHALF;
(8) PURCHASE AND MAINTAIN INSURANCE AND BONDS;

HOUSE BILL 45
(9) BORROW, ACCEPT, OR CONTRACT FOR SERVICES OF PERSONNEL,
INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, EMPLOYEES OF A PARTICIPATING STATE;
(10) CONDUCT AN ANNUAL FINANCIAL REVIEW;
(11) HIRE EMPLOYEES, ELECT OR APPOINT OFFICERS, FIX
COMPENSATION, DEFINE DUTIES, GRANT SUCH INDIVIDUALS APPROPRIATE
AUTHORITY TO CARRY OUT THE PURPOSES OF THE COMPACT, AND ESTABLISH THE
COMMISSION’S PERSONNEL POLICIES AND PROGRAMS RELATING TO CONFLICTS OF
INTEREST, QUALIFICATIONS OF PERSONNEL, AND OTHER RELATED PERSONNEL
MATTERS;
(12) AS SET FORTH IN THE COMMISSION RULES, CHARGE A FEE TO A
LICENSEE FOR THE GRANT OF A COMPACT PRIVILEGE IN A REMOTE STATE AND
THEREAFTER, AS MAY BE ESTABLISHED BY COMMISSION RULE, CHARGE THE
LICENSEE A COMPACT PRIVILEGE RENEWAL FEE FOR EACH RENEWAL PERIOD IN
WHICH THAT LICENSEE EXERCISES OR INTENDS TO EXERCISE THE COMPACT
PRIVILEGE IN THAT REMOTE STATE. NOTHING HEREIN SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO
PREVENT A REMOTE STATE FROM CHARGING A LICENSEE A FEE FOR A COMPACT
PRIVILEGE OR RENEWALS OF A COMPACT PRIVILEGE, OR A FEE FOR THE
JURISPRUDENCE REQUIREMENT IF THE REMOTE STATE IMPOSES SUCH A
REQUIREMENT FOR THE GRANT OF A COMPACT PRIVILEGE;
(13) ACCEPT ANY AND ALL APPROPRIATE GIFTS, DONATIONS, GRANTS
OF MONEY, OTHER SOURCES OF REVENUE, EQUIPMENT, SUPPLIES, MATERIALS, AND
SERVICES, AND RECEIVE, UTILIZE, AND DISPOSE OF THE SAME, PROVIDED THAT AT
ALL TIMES THE COMMISSION SHALL AVOID ANY APPEARANCE OF IMPROPRIETY
AND/OR CONFLICT OF INTEREST;
(14) LEASE, PURCHASE, RETAIN, OWN, HOLD, IMPROVE, OR USE ANY
PROPERTY, REAL, PERSONAL, OR MIXED, OR ANY UNDIVIDED INTEREST THEREIN;
(15) SELL, CONVEY, MORTGAGE, PLEDGE, LEASE, EXCHANGE,
ABANDON, OR OTHERWISE DISPOSE OF ANY PROPERTY, REAL, PERSONAL, OR MIXED;
(16) ESTABLISH A BUDGET AND MAKE EXPENDITURES;
(17) BORROW MONEY;
(18) APPOINT COMMITTEES, INCLUDING STANDING COMMITTEES,
WHICH MAY BE COMPOSED OF MEMBERS, STATE REGULATORS, STATE LEGISLATORS
OR THEIR REPRESENTATIVES, AND CONSUMER REPRESENTATIVES, AND SUCH

HOUSE BILL 45 15
OTHER INTERESTED PERSONS AS MAY BE DESIGNATED IN THIS COMPACT AND THE
BYLAWS;
(19) PROVIDE AND RECEIVE INFORMATION FROM, AND COOPERATE
WITH, LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES;
(20) ELECT A CHAIR, VICE CHAIR, SECRETARY, AND TREASURER AND
SUCH OTHER OFFICERS OF THE COMMISSION AS PROVIDED IN THE COMMISSION’S
BYLAWS;
(21) ESTABLISH AND ELECT AN EXECUTIVE BOARD;
(22) ADOPT AND PROVIDE TO THE PARTICIPATING STATES AN ANNUAL
REPORT;
(23) DETERMINE WHETHER A STATE’S ENACTED COMPACT IS
MATERIALLY DIFFERENT FROM THE MODEL COMPACT LANGUAGE SUCH THAT THE
STATE WOULD NOT QUALIFY FOR PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT; AND
(24) PERFORM SUCH OTHER FUNCTIONS AS MAY BE NECESSARY OR
APPROPRIATE TO ACHIEVE THE PURPOSES OF THIS COMPACT.
(D) (1) ALL MEETINGS OF THE COMMISSION THAT ARE NOT CLOSED
PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE OPEN TO THE PUBLIC. NOTICE OF
PUBLIC MEETINGS SHALL BE POSTED ON THE COMMISSION’S WEBSITE AT LEAST
THIRTY (30) DAYS PRIOR TO THE PUBLIC MEETING.
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
COMMISSION MAY CONVENE AN EMERGENCY PUBLIC MEETING BY PROVIDING AT
LEAST TWENTY–FOUR (24) HOURS PRIOR NOTICE ON THE COMMISSION’S WEBSITE,
AND BY ANY OTHER MEANS AS PROVIDED IN THE COMMISSION’S RULES, FOR ANY OF
THE REASONS IT MAY DISPENSE WITH NOTICE OF PROPOSED RULEMAKING UNDER
SECTION 9(L) OF THIS COMPACT. THE COMMISSION’S LEGAL COUNSEL SHALL
CERTIFY THAT ONE OF THE REASONS JUSTIFYING AN EMERGENCY PUBLIC MEETING
HAS BEEN MET.
(3) NOTICE OF ALL COMMISSION MEETINGS SHALL PROVIDE THE
TIME, DATE, AND LOCATION OF THE MEETING, AND IF THE MEETING IS TO BE HELD
OR ACCESSIBLE VIA TELECOMMUNICATION, VIDEO CONFERENCE, OR OTHER
ELECTRONIC MEANS, THE NOTICE SHALL INCLUDE THE MECHANISM FOR ACCESS TO
THE MEETING THROUGH SUCH MEANS.

HOUSE BILL 45
(4) THE COMMISSION MAY CONVENE IN A CLOSED, NONPUBLIC
MEETING FOR THE COMMISSION TO RECEIVE LEGAL ADVICE OR TO DISCUSS:
(I) NONCOMPLIANCE OF A PARTICIPATING STATE WITH ITS
OBLIGATIONS UNDER THE COMPACT;
(II) THE EMPLOYMENT, COMPENSATION, DISCIPLINE, OR
OTHER MATTERS, PRACTICES, OR PROCEDURES RELATED TO SPECIFIC EMPLOYEES
OR OTHER MATTERS RELATED TO THE COMMISSION’S INTERNAL PERSONNEL
PRACTICES AND PROCEDURES;
(III) CURRENT OR THREATENED DISCIPLINE OF A LICENSEE OR
COMPACT PRIVILEGE HOLDER BY THE COMMISSION OR BY A PARTICIPATING
STATE’S LICENSING AUTHORITY;
(IV) CURRENT, THREATENED, OR REASONABLY ANTICIPATED
LITIGATION;
(V) NEGOTIATION OF CONTRACTS FOR THE PURCHASE, LEASE,
OR SALE OF GOODS, SERVICES, OR REAL ESTATE;
(VI) ACCUSING ANY PERSON OF A CRIME OR FORMALLY
CENSURING ANY PERSON;
(VII) TRADE SECRETS OR COMMERCIAL OR FINANCIAL
INFORMATION THAT IS PRIVILEGED OR CONFIDENTIAL;
(VIII) INFORMATION OF A PERSONAL NATURE WHERE
DISCLOSURE WOULD CONSTITUTE A CLEARLY UNWARRANTED INVASION OF
PERSONAL PRIVACY;
(IX) INVESTIGATIVE RECORDS COMPILED FOR LAW
ENFORCEMENT PURPOSES;
(X) INFORMATION RELATED TO ANY INVESTIGATIVE REPORTS
PREPARED BY OR ON BEHALF OF OR FOR USE OF THE COMMISSION OR OTHER
COMMITTEE CHARGED WITH RESPONSIBILITY OF INVESTIGATION OR
DETERMINATION OF COMPLIANCE ISSUES PURSUANT TO THE COMPACT;
(XI) LEGAL ADVICE;
(XII) MATTERS SPECIFICALLY EXEMPTED FROM DISCLOSURE TO
THE PUBLIC BY FEDERAL OR PARTICIPATING STATE LAW; AND

HOUSE BILL 45 17
(XIII) OTHER MATTERS AS PROMULGATED BY THE COMMISSION
BY RULE.
(5) IF A MEETING, OR PORTION OF A MEETING, IS CLOSED, THE
PRESIDING OFFICER SHALL STATE THAT THE MEETING WILL BE CLOSED AND
REFERENCE EACH RELEVANT EXEMPTING PROVISION, AND SUCH REFERENCE
SHALL BE RECORDED IN THE MINUTES.
(6) THE COMMISSION SHALL KEEP MINUTES THAT FULLY AND
CLEARLY DESCRIBE ALL MATTERS DISCUSSED IN A MEETING AND SHALL PROVIDE A
FULL AND ACCURATE SUMMARY OF ACTIONS TAKEN, AND THE REASONS THEREFOR,
INCLUDING A DESCRIPTION OF THE VIEWS EXPRESSED. ALL DOCUMENTS
CONSIDERED IN CONNECTION WITH AN ACTION SHALL BE IDENTIFIED IN SUCH
MINUTES. ALL MINUTES AND DOCUMENTS OF A CLOSED MEETING SHALL REMAIN
UNDER SEAL, SUBJECT TO RELEASE ONLY BY A MAJORITY VOTE OF THE
COMMISSION OR ORDER OF A COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION.
(E) (1) THE COMMISSION SHALL PAY, OR PROVIDE FOR THE PAYMENT
OF, THE REASONABLE EXPENSES OF ITS ESTABLISHMENT, ORGANIZATION, AND
ONGOING ACTIVITIES.
(2) THE COMMISSION MAY ACCEPT ANY AND ALL APPROPRIATE
SOURCES OF REVENUE, DONATIONS, AND GRANTS OF MONEY, EQUIPMENT,
SUPPLIES, MATERIALS, AND SERVICES.
(3) THE COMMISSION MAY LEVY ON AND COLLECT AN ANNUAL
ASSESSMENT FROM EACH PARTICIPATING STATE AND IMPOSE FEES ON LICENSEES
OF PARTICIPATING STATES WHEN A COMPACT PRIVILEGE IS GRANTED, TO COVER
THE COST OF THE OPERATIONS AND ACTIVITIES OF THE COMMISSION AND ITS
STAFF, WHICH MUST BE IN A TOTAL AMOUNT SUFFICIENT TO COVER ITS ANNUAL
BUDGET AS APPROVED EACH FISCAL YEAR FOR WHICH SUFFICIENT REVENUE IS NOT
PROVIDED BY OTHER SOURCES. THE AGGREGATE ANNUAL ASSESSMENT AMOUNT
FOR PARTICIPATING STATES SHALL BE ALLOCATED BASED UPON A FORMULA THAT
THE COMMISSION SHALL PROMULGATE BY RULE.
(4) THE COMMISSION SHALL NOT INCUR OBLIGATIONS OF ANY KIND
PRIOR TO SECURING THE FUNDS ADEQUATE TO MEET THE SAME, NOR SHALL THE
COMMISSION PLEDGE THE CREDIT OF ANY PARTICIPATING STATE, EXCEPT BY AND
WITH THE AUTHORITY OF THE PARTICIPATING STATE.
(5) THE COMMISSION SHALL KEEP ACCURATE ACCOUNTS OF ALL
RECEIPTS AND DISBURSEMENTS. THE RECEIPTS AND DISBURSEMENTS OF THE

HOUSE BILL 45
COMMISSION SHALL BE SUBJECT TO THE FINANCIAL REVIEW AND ACCOUNTING
PROCEDURES ESTABLISHED UNDER ITS BYLAWS. ALL RECEIPTS AND
DISBURSEMENTS OF FUNDS HANDLED BY THE COMMISSION SHALL BE SUBJECT TO
AN ANNUAL FINANCIAL REVIEW BY A CERTIFIED OR LICENSED PUBLIC
ACCOUNTANT, AND THE REPORT OF THE FINANCIAL REVIEW SHALL BE INCLUDED IN
AND BECOME PART OF THE ANNUAL REPORT OF THE COMMISSION.
(F) (1) THE EXECUTIVE BOARD SHALL HAVE THE POWER TO ACT ON
BEHALF OF THE COMMISSION ACCORDING TO THE TERMS OF THIS COMPACT. THE
POWERS, DUTIES, AND RESPONSIBILITIES OF THE EXECUTIVE BOARD SHALL
INCLUDE:
(I) OVERSEEING THE DAY–TO–DAY ACTIVITIES OF THE
ADMINISTRATION OF THE COMPACT INCLUDING COMPLIANCE WITH THE
PROVISIONS OF THE COMPACT, THE COMMISSION’S RULES AND BYLAWS;
(II) RECOMMENDING TO THE COMMISSION CHANGES TO THE
RULES OR BYLAWS, CHANGES TO THIS COMPACT LEGISLATION, FEES CHARGED TO
COMPACT PARTICIPATING STATES, FEES CHARGED TO LICENSEES, AND OTHER
FEES;
(III) ENSURING COMPACT ADMINISTRATION SERVICES ARE
APPROPRIATELY PROVIDED, INCLUDING BY CONTRACT;
(IV) PREPARING AND RECOMMENDING THE BUDGET;
(V) MAINTAINING FINANCIAL RECORDS ON BEHALF OF THE
COMMISSION;
(VI) MONITORING COMPACT COMPLIANCE OF PARTICIPATING
STATES AND PROVIDING COMPLIANCE REPORTS TO THE COMMISSION;
(VII) ESTABLISHING ADDITIONAL COMMITTEES AS NECESSARY;
(VIII) EXERCISING THE POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE
COMMISSION DURING THE INTERIM BETWEEN COMMISSION MEETINGS, EXCEPT
FOR ADOPTING OR AMENDING RULES, ADOPTING OR AMENDING BYLAWS, AND
EXERCISING ANY OTHER POWERS AND DUTIES EXPRESSLY RESERVED TO THE
COMMISSION BY RULE OR BYLAW; AND
(IX) OTHER DUTIES AS PROVIDED IN THE RULES OR BYLAWS OF
THE COMMISSION.

HOUSE BILL 45 19
(2) THE EXECUTIVE BOARD SHALL BE COMPOSED OF UP TO SEVEN
(7) MEMBERS:
(I) THE CHAIR, VICE CHAIR, SECRETARY, AND TREASURER OF
THE COMMISSION AND ANY OTHER MEMBERS OF THE COMMISSION WHO SERVE ON
THE EXECUTIVE BOARD SHALL BE VOTING MEMBERS OF THE EXECUTIVE BOARD;
AND
(II) OTHER THAN THE CHAIR, VICE CHAIR, SECRETARY, AND
TREASURER, THE COMMISSION MAY ELECT UP TO THREE (3) VOTING MEMBERS
FROM THE CURRENT MEMBERSHIP OF THE COMMISSION.
(3) THE COMMISSION MAY REMOVE ANY MEMBER OF THE EXECUTIVE
BOARD AS PROVIDED IN THE COMMISSION’S BYLAWS.
(4) (I) THE EXECUTIVE BOARD SHALL MEET AT LEAST ANNUALLY.
(II) AN EXECUTIVE BOARD MEETING AT WHICH IT TAKES OR
INTENDS TO TAKE FORMAL ACTION ON A MATTER SHALL BE OPEN TO THE PUBLIC,
EXCEPT THAT THE EXECUTIVE BOARD MAY MEET IN A CLOSED, NONPUBLIC SESSION
OF A PUBLIC MEETING WHEN DEALING WITH ANY OF THE MATTERS COVERED UNDER
SUBSECTION (D)(4) OF THIS SECTION.
(III) THE EXECUTIVE BOARD SHALL GIVE FIVE (5) BUSINESS
DAYS’ NOTICE OF ITS PUBLIC MEETINGS, POSTED ON ITS WEBSITE AND AS IT MAY
OTHERWISE DETERMINE TO PROVIDE NOTICE TO PERSONS WITH AN INTEREST IN
THE PUBLIC MATTERS THE EXECUTIVE BOARD INTENDS TO ADDRESS AT THOSE
MEETINGS.
(5) THE EXECUTIVE BOARD MAY HOLD AN EMERGENCY MEETING
WHEN ACTING FOR THE COMMISSION TO:
(I) MEET AN IMMINENT THREAT TO PUBLIC HEALTH, SAFETY,
OR WELFARE;
(II) PREVENT A LOSS OF COMMISSION OR PARTICIPATING
STATE FUNDS; OR
(III) PROTECT PUBLIC HEALTH AND SAFETY.
(G) (1) THE MEMBERS, OFFICERS, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, EMPLOYEES,
AND REPRESENTATIVES OF THE COMMISSION SHALL BE IMMUNE FROM SUIT AND
LIABILITY, BOTH PERSONALLY AND IN THEIR OFFICIAL CAPACITY, FOR ANY CLAIM

HOUSE BILL 45
FOR DAMAGE TO OR LOSS OF PROPERTY OR PERSONAL INJURY OR OTHER CIVIL
LIABILITY CAUSED BY OR ARISING OUT OF ANY ACTUAL OR ALLEGED ACT, ERROR,
OR OMISSION THAT OCCURRED, OR THAT THE PERSON AGAINST WHOM THE CLAIM
IS MADE HAD A REASONABLE BASIS FOR BELIEVING OCCURRED, WITHIN THE SCOPE
OF COMMISSION EMPLOYMENT, DUTIES, OR RESPONSIBILITIES, PROVIDED THAT
NOTHING IN THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO PROTECT ANY SUCH
PERSON FROM SUIT OR LIABILITY FOR ANY DAMAGE, LOSS, INJURY, OR LIABILITY
CAUSED BY THE INTENTIONAL OR WILLFUL OR WANTON MISCONDUCT OF THAT
PERSON. THE PROCUREMENT OF INSURANCE OF ANY TYPE BY THE COMMISSION
SHALL NOT IN ANY WAY COMPROMISE OR LIMIT THE IMMUNITY GRANTED
HEREUNDER.
(2) THE COMMISSION SHALL DEFEND ANY MEMBER, OFFICER,
EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, EMPLOYEE, AND REPRESENTATIVE OF THE COMMISSION IN
ANY CIVIL ACTION SEEKING TO IMPOSE LIABILITY ARISING OUT OF ANY ACTUAL OR
ALLEGED ACT, ERROR, OR OMISSION THAT OCCURRED WITHIN THE SCOPE OF
COMMISSION EMPLOYMENT, DUTIES, OR RESPONSIBILITIES, OR AS DETERMINED BY
THE COMMISSION THAT THE PERSON AGAINST WHOM THE CLAIM IS MADE HAD A
REASONABLE BASIS FOR BELIEVING OCCURRED WITHIN THE SCOPE OF
COMMISSION EMPLOYMENT, DUTIES, OR RESPONSIBILITIES, PROVIDED THAT
NOTHING HEREIN SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT THAT PERSON FROM
RETAINING THEIR OWN COUNSEL AT THEIR OWN EXPENSE, AND PROVIDED
FURTHER, THAT THE ACTUAL OR ALLEGED ACT, ERROR, OR OMISSION DID NOT
RESULT FROM THAT PERSON’S INTENTIONAL OR WILLFUL OR WANTON
MISCONDUCT.
(3) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, SHOULD
ANY MEMBER, OFFICER, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, EMPLOYEE, OR REPRESENTATIVE
OF THE COMMISSION BE HELD LIABLE FOR THE AMOUNT OF ANY SETTLEMENT OR
JUDGMENT ARISING OUT OF ANY ACTUAL OR ALLEGED ACT, ERROR, OR OMISSION
THAT OCCURRED WITHIN THE SCOPE OF THAT INDIVIDUAL’S EMPLOYMENT, DUTIES,
OR RESPONSIBILITIES FOR THE COMMISSION, OR THAT THE PERSON TO WHOM THAT
INDIVIDUAL IS LIABLE HAD A REASONABLE BASIS FOR BELIEVING OCCURRED
WITHIN THE SCOPE OF THE INDIVIDUAL’S EMPLOYMENT, DUTIES, OR
RESPONSIBILITIES FOR THE COMMISSION, THE COMMISSION SHALL INDEMNIFY
AND HOLD HARMLESS SUCH INDIVIDUAL, PROVIDED THAT THE ACTUAL OR ALLEGED
ACT, ERROR, OR OMISSION DID NOT RESULT FROM THE INTENTIONAL OR WILLFUL
OR WANTON MISCONDUCT OF THE INDIVIDUAL.
(4) NOTHING HEREIN SHALL BE CONSTRUED AS A LIMITATION ON
THE LIABILITY OF ANY LICENSEE FOR PROFESSIONAL MALPRACTICE OR
MISCONDUCT, WHICH SHALL BE GOVERNED SOLELY BY ANY OTHER APPLICABLE
STATE LAWS.

HOUSE BILL 45 21
(5) NOTHING IN THIS COMPACT SHALL BE INTERPRETED TO WAIVE
OR OTHERWISE ABROGATE A PARTICIPATING STATE’S STATE ACTION IMMUNITY OR
STATE ACTION AFFIRMATIVE DEFENSE WITH RESPECT TO ANTITRUST CLAIMS
UNDER THE SHERMAN ACT, CLAYTON ACT, OR ANY OTHER STATE OR FEDERAL
ANTITRUST OR ANTICOMPETITIVE LAW OR REGULATION.
(6) NOTHING IN THIS COMPACT SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO BE A
WAIVER OF SOVEREIGN IMMUNITY BY THE PARTICIPATING STATES OR BY THE
COMMISSION.
SECTION 8. DATA SYSTEM.
(A) THE COMMISSION SHALL PROVIDE FOR THE DEVELOPMENT,
MAINTENANCE, OPERATION, AND UTILIZATION OF A COORDINATED DATABASE AND
REPORTING SYSTEM CONTAINING LICENSURE, ADVERSE ACTION, AND THE
PRESENCE OF SIGNIFICANT INVESTIGATIVE INFORMATION ON ALL LICENSEES AND
APPLICANTS FOR A LICENSE IN PARTICIPATING STATES.
(B) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF STATE LAW TO THE
CONTRARY, A PARTICIPATING STATE SHALL SUBMIT A UNIFORM DATA SET TO THE
DATA SYSTEM ON ALL INDIVIDUALS TO WHOM THIS COMPACT IS APPLICABLE AS
REQUIRED BY THE RULES OF THE COMMISSION, INCLUDING:
(1) IDENTIFYING INFORMATION;
(2) LICENSURE DATA;
(3) ADVERSE ACTIONS AGAINST A LICENSEE, LICENSE APPLICANT,
OR COMPACT PRIVILEGE AND INFORMATION RELATED THERETO;
(4) NONCONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION RELATED TO ALTERNATIVE
PROGRAM PARTICIPATION, THE BEGINNING AND ENDING DATES OF SUCH
PARTICIPATION, AND OTHER INFORMATION RELATED TO SUCH PARTICIPATION;
(5) ANY DENIAL OF AN APPLICATION FOR LICENSURE, AND THE
REASON(S) FOR SUCH DENIAL (EXCLUDING THE REPORTING OF ANY CRIMINAL
HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION WHERE PROHIBITED BY LAW);
(6) THE PRESENCE OF SIGNIFICANT INVESTIGATIVE INFORMATION;
AND

HOUSE BILL 45
(7) OTHER INFORMATION THAT MAY FACILITATE THE
ADMINISTRATION OF THIS COMPACT OR THE PROTECTION OF THE PUBLIC, AS
DETERMINED BY THE RULES OF THE COMMISSION.
(C) THE RECORDS AND INFORMATION PROVIDED TO A PARTICIPATING
STATE PURSUANT TO THIS COMPACT OR THROUGH THE DATA SYSTEM, WHEN
CERTIFIED BY THE COMMISSION OR AN AGENT THEREOF, SHALL CONSTITUTE THE
AUTHENTICATED BUSINESS RECORDS OF THE COMMISSION, AND SHALL BE
ENTITLED TO ANY ASSOCIATED HEARSAY EXCEPTION IN ANY RELEVANT JUDICIAL,
QUASI–JUDICIAL, OR ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEEDINGS IN A PARTICIPATING STATE.
(D) SIGNIFICANT INVESTIGATIVE INFORMATION PERTAINING TO A
LICENSEE IN ANY PARTICIPATING STATE WILL ONLY BE AVAILABLE TO OTHER
PARTICIPATING STATES.
(E) IT IS THE RESPONSIBILITY OF THE PARTICIPATING STATES TO MONITOR
THE DATABASE TO DETERMINE WHETHER ADVERSE ACTION HAS BEEN TAKEN
AGAINST A LICENSEE OR LICENSE APPLICANT. ADVERSE ACTION INFORMATION
PERTAINING TO A LICENSEE OR LICENSE APPLICANT IN ANY PARTICIPATING STATE
WILL BE AVAILABLE TO ANY OTHER PARTICIPATING STATE.
(F) PARTICIPATING STATES CONTRIBUTING INFORMATION TO THE DATA
SYSTEM MAY DESIGNATE INFORMATION THAT MAY NOT BE SHARED WITH THE
PUBLIC WITHOUT THE EXPRESS PERMISSION OF THE CONTRIBUTING STATE.
(G) ANY INFORMATION SUBMITTED TO THE DATA SYSTEM THAT IS
SUBSEQUENTLY EXPUNGED PURSUANT TO FEDERAL LAW OR THE LAWS OF THE
PARTICIPATING STATE CONTRIBUTING THE INFORMATION SHALL BE REMOVED
FROM THE DATA SYSTEM.
SECTION 9. RULEMAKING.
(A) THE COMMISSION SHALL PROMULGATE REASONABLE RULES IN ORDER
TO EFFECTIVELY AND EFFICIENTLY IMPLEMENT AND ADMINISTER THE PURPOSES
AND PROVISIONS OF THE COMPACT. A COMMISSION RULE SHALL BE INVALID AND
HAVE NO FORCE OR EFFECT ONLY IF A COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION HOLDS
THAT THE RULE IS INVALID BECAUSE THE COMMISSION EXERCISED ITS
RULEMAKING AUTHORITY IN A MANNER THAT IS BEYOND THE SCOPE AND PURPOSES
OF THE COMPACT, OR THE POWERS GRANTED HEREUNDER, OR BASED UPON
ANOTHER APPLICABLE STANDARD OF REVIEW.
(B) THE RULES OF THE COMMISSION SHALL HAVE THE FORCE OF LAW IN
EACH PARTICIPATING STATE, PROVIDED HOWEVER THAT WHERE THE RULES OF THE

HOUSE BILL 45 23
COMMISSION CONFLICT WITH THE LAWS OF THE PARTICIPATING STATE THAT
ESTABLISH THE PARTICIPATING STATE’S SCOPE OF PRACTICE AS HELD BY A COURT
OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION, THE RULES OF THE COMMISSION SHALL BE
INEFFECTIVE IN THAT STATE TO THE EXTENT OF THE CONFLICT.
(C) THE COMMISSION SHALL EXERCISE ITS RULEMAKING POWERS
PURSUANT TO THE CRITERIA SET FORTH IN THIS SECTION AND THE RULES ADOPTED
THEREUNDER. RULES SHALL BECOME BINDING AS OF THE DATE SPECIFIED BY THE
COMMISSION FOR EACH RULE.
(D) IF A MAJORITY OF THE LEGISLATURES OF THE PARTICIPATING STATES
REJECTS A COMMISSION RULE OR PORTION OF A COMMISSION RULE, BY
ENACTMENT OF A STATUTE OR RESOLUTION IN THE SAME MANNER USED TO ADOPT
THE COMPACT, WITHIN FOUR (4) YEARS OF THE DATE OF ADOPTION OF THE RULE,
THEN SUCH RULE SHALL HAVE NO FURTHER FORCE AND EFFECT IN ANY
PARTICIPATING STATE OR TO ANY STATE APPLYING TO PARTICIPATE IN THE
COMPACT.
(E) RULES SHALL BE ADOPTED AT A REGULAR OR SPECIAL MEETING OF THE
COMMISSION.
(F) PRIOR TO ADOPTION OF A PROPOSED RULE, THE COMMISSION SHALL
HOLD A PUBLIC HEARING AND ALLOW PERSONS TO PROVIDE ORAL AND WRITTEN
COMMENTS, DATA, FACTS, OPINIONS, AND ARGUMENTS.
(G) PRIOR TO ADOPTION OF A PROPOSED RULE BY THE COMMISSION, AND
AT LEAST THIRTY (30) DAYS IN ADVANCE OF THE MEETING AT WHICH THE
COMMISSION WILL HOLD A PUBLIC HEARING ON THE PROPOSED RULE, THE
COMMISSION SHALL PROVIDE A NOTICE OF PROPOSED RULEMAKING:
(1) ON THE WEBSITE OF THE COMMISSION OR OTHER PUBLICLY
ACCESSIBLE PLATFORM;
(2) TO PERSONS WHO HAVE REQUESTED NOTICE OF THE
COMMISSION’S NOTICES OF PROPOSED RULEMAKING; AND
(3) IN SUCH OTHER WAY(S) AS THE COMMISSION MAY BY RULE
SPECIFY.
(H) THE NOTICE OF PROPOSED RULEMAKING SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) THE TIME, DATE, AND LOCATION OF THE PUBLIC HEARING AT
WHICH THE COMMISSION WILL HEAR PUBLIC COMMENTS ON THE PROPOSED RULE

HOUSE BILL 45
AND, IF DIFFERENT, THE TIME, DATE, AND LOCATION OF THE MEETING WHERE THE
COMMISSION WILL CONSIDER AND VOTE ON THE PROPOSED RULE;
(2) IF THE HEARING IS HELD VIA TELECOMMUNICATION, VIDEO
CONFERENCE, OR OTHER ELECTRONIC MEANS, THE COMMISSION SHALL INCLUDE
THE MECHANISM FOR ACCESS TO THE HEARING IN THE NOTICE OF PROPOSED
RULEMAKING;
(3) THE TEXT OF THE PROPOSED RULE AND THE REASON THEREFOR;
(4) A REQUEST FOR COMMENTS ON THE PROPOSED RULE FROM ANY
INTERESTED PERSON; AND
(5) THE MANNER IN WHICH INTERESTED PERSONS MAY SUBMIT
WRITTEN COMMENTS.
(I) ALL HEARINGS WILL BE RECORDED. A COPY OF THE RECORDING AND
ALL WRITTEN COMMENTS AND DOCUMENTS RECEIVED BY THE COMMISSION IN
RESPONSE TO THE PROPOSED RULE SHALL BE AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC.
(J) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED AS REQUIRING A
SEPARATE HEARING ON EACH COMMISSION RULE. RULES MAY BE GROUPED FOR
THE CONVENIENCE OF THE COMMISSION AT HEARINGS REQUIRED BY THIS SECTION.
(K) (1) THE COMMISSION SHALL, BY MAJORITY VOTE OF ALL
COMMISSIONERS, TAKE FINAL ACTION ON THE PROPOSED RULE BASED ON THE
RULEMAKING RECORD.
(2) THE COMMISSION MAY ADOPT CHANGES TO THE PROPOSED RULE
PROVIDED THE CHANGES DO NOT ENLARGE THE ORIGINAL PURPOSE OF THE
PROPOSED RULE.
(3) THE COMMISSION SHALL PROVIDE AN EXPLANATION OF THE
REASONS FOR SUBSTANTIVE CHANGES MADE TO THE PROPOSED RULE AS WELL AS
REASONS FOR SUBSTANTIVE CHANGES NOT MADE THAT WERE RECOMMENDED BY
COMMENTERS.
(4) THE COMMISSION SHALL DETERMINE A REASONABLE EFFECTIVE
DATE FOR THE RULE. EXCEPT FOR AN EMERGENCY AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (L)
OF THIS SECTION, THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE RULE SHALL BE NO SOONER THAN
THIRTY (30) DAYS AFTER THE COMMISSION ISSUING THE NOTICE THAT IT ADOPTED
OR AMENDED THE RULE.

HOUSE BILL 45 25
(L) UPON DETERMINATION THAT AN EMERGENCY EXISTS, THE
COMMISSION MAY CONSIDER AND ADOPT AN EMERGENCY RULE WITH 24 HOURS’
NOTICE, WITH OPPORTUNITY TO COMMENT, PROVIDED THAT THE USUAL
RULEMAKING PROCEDURES PROVIDED IN THE COMPACT AND IN THIS SECTION
SHALL BE RETROACTIVELY APPLIED TO THE RULE AS SOON AS REASONABLY
POSSIBLE, IN NO EVENT LATER THAN NINETY (90) DAYS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE
OF THE RULE. FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS PROVISION, AN EMERGENCY RULE IS ONE
THAT MUST BE ADOPTED IMMEDIATELY IN ORDER TO:
(1) MEET AN IMMINENT THREAT TO PUBLIC HEALTH, SAFETY, OR
WELFARE;
(2) PREVENT A LOSS OF COMMISSION OR PARTICIPATING STATE
FUNDS;
(3) MEET A DEADLINE FOR THE PROMULGATION OF A RULE THAT IS
ESTABLISHED BY FEDERAL LAW OR RULE; OR
(4) PROTECT PUBLIC HEALTH AND SAFETY.
(M) THE COMMISSION OR AN AUTHORIZED COMMITTEE OF THE
COMMISSION MAY DIRECT REVISIONS TO A PREVIOUSLY ADOPTED RULE FOR
PURPOSES OF CORRECTING TYPOGRAPHICAL ERRORS, ERRORS IN FORMAT,
ERRORS IN CONSISTENCY, OR GRAMMATICAL ERRORS. PUBLIC NOTICE OF ANY
REVISIONS SHALL BE POSTED ON THE WEBSITE OF THE COMMISSION. THE REVISION
SHALL BE SUBJECT TO CHALLENGE BY ANY PERSON FOR A PERIOD OF THIRTY (30)
DAYS AFTER POSTING. THE REVISION MAY BE CHALLENGED ONLY ON GROUNDS
THAT THE REVISION RESULTS IN A MATERIAL CHANGE TO A RULE. A CHALLENGE
SHALL BE MADE IN WRITING AND DELIVERED TO THE COMMISSION PRIOR TO THE
END OF THE NOTICE PERIOD. IF NO CHALLENGE IS MADE, THE REVISION WILL TAKE
EFFECT WITHOUT FURTHER ACTION. IF THE REVISION IS CHALLENGED, THE
REVISION MAY NOT TAKE EFFECT WITHOUT THE APPROVAL OF THE COMMISSION.
(N) NO PARTICIPATING STATE’S RULEMAKING REQUIREMENTS SHALL
APPLY UNDER THIS COMPACT.
SECTION 10. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND
ENFORCEMENT.
(A) (1) THE EXECUTIVE AND JUDICIAL BRANCHES OF STATE
GOVERNMENT IN EACH PARTICIPATING STATE SHALL ENFORCE THIS COMPACT AND
TAKE ALL ACTIONS NECESSARY AND APPROPRIATE TO IMPLEMENT THE COMPACT.

HOUSE BILL 45
(2) VENUE IS PROPER AND JUDICIAL PROCEEDINGS BY OR AGAINST
THE COMMISSION SHALL BE BROUGHT SOLELY AND EXCLUSIVELY IN A COURT OF
COMPETENT JURISDICTION WHERE THE PRINCIPAL OFFICE OF THE COMMISSION IS
LOCATED. THE COMMISSION MAY WAIVE VENUE AND JURISDICTIONAL DEFENSES
TO THE EXTENT IT ADOPTS OR CONSENTS TO PARTICIPATE IN ALTERNATIVE
DISPUTE RESOLUTION PROCEEDINGS. NOTHING HEREIN SHALL AFFECT OR LIMIT
THE SELECTION OR PROPRIETY OF VENUE IN ANY ACTION AGAINST A LICENSEE FOR
PROFESSIONAL MALPRACTICE, MISCONDUCT, OR ANY SUCH SIMILAR MATTER.
(3) THE COMMISSION SHALL BE ENTITLED TO RECEIVE SERVICE OF
PROCESS IN ANY PROCEEDING REGARDING THE ENFORCEMENT OR
INTERPRETATION OF THE COMPACT OR COMMISSION RULE AND SHALL HAVE
STANDING TO INTERVENE IN SUCH A PROCEEDING FOR ALL PURPOSES. FAILURE TO
PROVIDE THE COMMISSION SERVICE OF PROCESS SHALL RENDER A JUDGMENT OR
ORDER VOID AS TO THE COMMISSION, THIS COMPACT, OR PROMULGATED RULES.
(B) (1) IF THE COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT A PARTICIPATING STATE
HAS DEFAULTED IN THE PERFORMANCE OF ITS OBLIGATIONS OR RESPONSIBILITIES
UNDER THIS COMPACT OR THE PROMULGATED RULES, THE COMMISSION SHALL
PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE TO THE DEFAULTING STATE. THE NOTICE OF DEFAULT
SHALL DESCRIBE THE DEFAULT, THE PROPOSED MEANS OF CURING THE DEFAULT,
AND ANY OTHER ACTION THAT THE COMMISSION MAY TAKE, AND SHALL OFFER
TRAINING AND SPECIFIC TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE REGARDING THE DEFAULT.
(2) THE COMMISSION SHALL PROVIDE A COPY OF THE NOTICE OF
DEFAULT TO THE OTHER PARTICIPATING STATES.
(C) IF A STATE IN DEFAULT FAILS TO CURE THE DEFAULT, THE DEFAULTING
STATE MAY BE TERMINATED FROM THE COMPACT UPON AN AFFIRMATIVE VOTE OF
A MAJORITY OF THE COMMISSIONERS, AND ALL RIGHTS, PRIVILEGES, AND BENEFITS
CONFERRED ON THAT STATE BY THIS COMPACT MAY BE TERMINATED ON THE
EFFECTIVE DATE OF TERMINATION. A CURE OF THE DEFAULT DOES NOT RELIEVE
THE OFFENDING STATE OF OBLIGATIONS OR LIABILITIES INCURRED DURING THE
PERIOD OF DEFAULT.
(D) TERMINATION OF PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT SHALL BE IMPOSED
ONLY AFTER ALL OTHER MEANS OF SECURING COMPLIANCE HAVE BEEN
EXHAUSTED. NOTICE OF INTENT TO SUSPEND OR TERMINATE SHALL BE GIVEN BY
THE COMMISSION TO THE GOVERNOR, THE MAJORITY AND MINORITY LEADERS OF
THE DEFAULTING STATE’S LEGISLATURE, THE DEFAULTING STATE’S STATE
LICENSING AUTHORITY OR AUTHORITIES, AS APPLICABLE, AND EACH OF THE
PARTICIPATING STATES’ STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY OR AUTHORITIES, AS
APPLICABLE.

HOUSE BILL 45 27
(E) A STATE THAT HAS BEEN TERMINATED IS RESPONSIBLE FOR ALL
ASSESSMENTS, OBLIGATIONS, AND LIABILITIES INCURRED THROUGH THE
EFFECTIVE DATE OF TERMINATION, INCLUDING OBLIGATIONS THAT EXTEND
BEYOND THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF TERMINATION.
(F) UPON THE TERMINATION OF A STATE’S PARTICIPATION IN THIS
COMPACT, THAT STATE SHALL IMMEDIATELY PROVIDE NOTICE TO ALL LICENSEES
OF THE STATE, INCLUDING LICENSEES OF OTHER PARTICIPATING STATES ISSUED A
COMPACT PRIVILEGE TO PRACTICE WITHIN THAT STATE, OF SUCH TERMINATION.
THE TERMINATED STATE SHALL CONTINUE TO RECOGNIZE ALL COMPACT
PRIVILEGES THEN IN EFFECT IN THAT STATE FOR A MINIMUM OF ONE HUNDRED
EIGHTY (180) DAYS AFTER THE DATE OF SAID NOTICE OF TERMINATION.
(G) THE COMMISSION SHALL NOT BEAR ANY COSTS RELATED TO A STATE
THAT IS FOUND TO BE IN DEFAULT OR THAT HAS BEEN TERMINATED FROM THE
COMPACT, UNLESS AGREED UPON IN WRITING BETWEEN THE COMMISSION AND THE
DEFAULTING STATE.
(H) THE DEFAULTING STATE MAY APPEAL THE ACTION OF THE COMMISSION
BY PETITIONING THE UNITED STATES DISTRICT COURT FOR THE DISTRICT OF
COLUMBIA OR THE FEDERAL DISTRICT WHERE THE COMMISSION HAS ITS
PRINCIPAL OFFICES. THE PREVAILING PARTY SHALL BE AWARDED ALL COSTS OF
SUCH LITIGATION, INCLUDING REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES.
(I) (1) UPON REQUEST BY A PARTICIPATING STATE, THE COMMISSION
SHALL ATTEMPT TO RESOLVE DISPUTES RELATED TO THE COMPACT THAT ARISE
AMONG PARTICIPATING STATES AND BETWEEN PARTICIPATING STATES AND
NONPARTICIPATING STATES.
(2) THE COMMISSION SHALL PROMULGATE A RULE PROVIDING FOR
BOTH MEDIATION AND BINDING DISPUTE RESOLUTION FOR DISPUTES AS
APPROPRIATE.
(J) (1) THE COMMISSION, IN THE REASONABLE EXERCISE OF ITS
DISCRETION, SHALL ENFORCE THE PROVISIONS OF THIS COMPACT AND THE
COMMISSION’S RULES.
(2) BY MAJORITY VOTE, THE COMMISSION MAY INITIATE LEGAL
ACTION AGAINST A PARTICIPATING STATE IN DEFAULT IN THE UNITED STATES
DISTRICT COURT FOR THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA OR THE FEDERAL DISTRICT
WHERE THE COMMISSION HAS ITS PRINCIPAL OFFICES TO ENFORCE COMPLIANCE
WITH THE PROVISIONS OF THE COMPACT AND ITS PROMULGATED RULES. THE

HOUSE BILL 45
RELIEF SOUGHT MAY INCLUDE BOTH INJUNCTIVE RELIEF AND DAMAGES. IN THE
EVENT JUDICIAL ENFORCEMENT IS NECESSARY, THE PREVAILING PARTY SHALL BE
AWARDED ALL COSTS OF SUCH LITIGATION, INCLUDING REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S
FEES. THE REMEDIES HEREIN SHALL NOT BE THE EXCLUSIVE REMEDIES OF THE
COMMISSION. THE COMMISSION MAY PURSUE ANY OTHER REMEDIES AVAILABLE
UNDER FEDERAL OR THE DEFAULTING PARTICIPATING STATE’S LAW.
(3) A PARTICIPATING STATE MAY INITIATE LEGAL ACTION AGAINST
THE COMMISSION IN THE UNITED STATES DISTRICT COURT FOR THE DISTRICT OF
COLUMBIA OR THE FEDERAL DISTRICT WHERE THE COMMISSION HAS ITS
PRINCIPAL OFFICES TO ENFORCE COMPLIANCE WITH THE PROVISIONS OF THE
COMPACT AND ITS PROMULGATED RULES. THE RELIEF SOUGHT MAY INCLUDE BOTH
INJUNCTIVE RELIEF AND DAMAGES. IN THE EVENT JUDICIAL ENFORCEMENT IS
NECESSARY, THE PREVAILING PARTY SHALL BE AWARDED ALL COSTS OF SUCH
LITIGATION, INCLUDING REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES.
(4) NO INDIVIDUAL OR ENTITY OTHER THAN A PARTICIPATING STATE
MAY ENFORCE THIS COMPACT AGAINST THE COMMISSION.
SECTION 11. EFFECTIVE DATE, WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT.
(A) (1) THE COMPACT SHALL COME INTO EFFECT ON THE DATE ON
WHICH THE COMPACT STATUTE IS ENACTED INTO LAW IN THE SEVENTH
PARTICIPATING STATE.
(2) (I) ON OR AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE COMPACT, THE
COMMISSION SHALL CONVENE AND REVIEW THE ENACTMENT OF EACH OF THE
STATES THAT ENACTED THE COMPACT PRIOR TO THE COMMISSION CONVENING
(“CHARTER PARTICIPATING STATES”) TO DETERMINE IF THE STATUTE ENACTED BY
EACH SUCH CHARTER PARTICIPATING STATE IS MATERIALLY DIFFERENT THAN THE
MODEL COMPACT.
(II) A CHARTER PARTICIPATING STATE WHOSE ENACTMENT IS
FOUND TO BE MATERIALLY DIFFERENT FROM THE MODEL COMPACT SHALL BE
ENTITLED TO THE DEFAULT PROCESS SET FORTH IN SECTION 10 OF THIS COMPACT.
(III) IF ANY PARTICIPATING STATE IS LATER FOUND TO BE IN
DEFAULT, OR IS TERMINATED OR WITHDRAWS FROM THE COMPACT, THE
COMMISSION SHALL REMAIN IN EXISTENCE AND THE COMPACT SHALL REMAIN IN
EFFECT EVEN IF THE NUMBER OF PARTICIPATING STATES SHOULD BE LESS THAN
SEVEN (7).

HOUSE BILL 45 29
(3) PARTICIPATING STATES ENACTING THE COMPACT SUBSEQUENT
TO THE CHARTER PARTICIPATING STATES SHALL BE SUBJECT TO THE PROCESS SET
FORTH IN SECTION 7(C) OF THIS COMPACT TO DETERMINE IF THEIR ENACTMENTS
ARE MATERIALLY DIFFERENT FROM THE MODEL COMPACT AND WHETHER THEY
QUALIFY FOR PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT.
(4) ALL ACTIONS TAKEN FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE COMMISSION OR
IN FURTHERANCE OF THE PURPOSES OF THE ADMINISTRATION OF THE COMPACT
PRIOR TO THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE COMPACT OR THE COMMISSION COMING
INTO EXISTENCE SHALL BE CONSIDERED TO BE ACTIONS OF THE COMMISSION
UNLESS SPECIFICALLY REPUDIATED BY THE COMMISSION.
(5) ANY STATE THAT JOINS THE COMPACT SUBSEQUENT TO THE
COMMISSION’S INITIAL ADOPTION OF THE RULES AND BYLAWS SHALL BE SUBJECT
TO THE COMMISSION’S RULES AND BYLAWS AS THEY EXIST ON THE DATE ON WHICH
THE COMPACT BECOMES LAW IN THAT STATE. ANY RULE THAT HAS BEEN
PREVIOUSLY ADOPTED BY THE COMMISSION SHALL HAVE THE FULL FORCE AND
EFFECT OF LAW ON THE DAY THE COMPACT BECOMES LAW IN THAT STATE.
(B) (1) ANY PARTICIPATING STATE MAY WITHDRAW FROM THIS
COMPACT BY ENACTING A STATUTE REPEALING THAT STATE’S ENACTMENT OF THE
COMPACT.
(2) A PARTICIPATING STATE’S WITHDRAWAL SHALL NOT TAKE
EFFECT UNTIL ONE HUNDRED EIGHTY (180) DAYS AFTER ENACTMENT OF THE
REPEALING STATUTE.
(3) WITHDRAWAL SHALL NOT AFFECT THE CONTINUING
REQUIREMENT OF THE WITHDRAWING STATE’S LICENSING AUTHORITY OR
AUTHORITIES TO COMPLY WITH THE INVESTIGATIVE AND ADVERSE ACTION
REPORTING REQUIREMENTS OF THIS COMPACT PRIOR TO THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF
WITHDRAWAL.
(4) UPON THE ENACTMENT OF A STATUTE WITHDRAWING FROM THIS
COMPACT, THE STATE SHALL IMMEDIATELY PROVIDE NOTICE OF SUCH
WITHDRAWAL TO ALL LICENSEES WITHIN THAT STATE. NOTWITHSTANDING ANY
SUBSEQUENT STATUTORY ENACTMENT TO THE CONTRARY, SUCH WITHDRAWING
STATE SHALL CONTINUE TO RECOGNIZE ALL COMPACT PRIVILEGES TO PRACTICE
WITHIN THAT STATE GRANTED PURSUANT TO THIS COMPACT FOR A MINIMUM OF
ONE HUNDRED EIGHTY (180) DAYS AFTER THE DATE OF SUCH NOTICE OF
WITHDRAWAL.

HOUSE BILL 45
(C) NOTHING CONTAINED IN THIS COMPACT SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO
INVALIDATE OR PREVENT ANY LICENSURE AGREEMENT OR OTHER COOPERATIVE
ARRANGEMENT BETWEEN A PARTICIPATING STATE AND A NONPARTICIPATING
STATE THAT DOES NOT CONFLICT WITH THE PROVISIONS OF THIS COMPACT.
(D) THIS COMPACT MAY BE AMENDED BY THE PARTICIPATING STATES. NO
AMENDMENT TO THIS COMPACT SHALL BECOME EFFECTIVE AND BINDING UPON
ANY PARTICIPATING STATE UNTIL IT IS ENACTED INTO THE LAWS OF ALL
PARTICIPATING STATES.
SECTION 12. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY.
(A) THIS COMPACT AND THE COMMISSION’S RULEMAKING AUTHORITY
SHALL BE LIBERALLY CONSTRUED SO AS TO EFFECTUATE THE PURPOSES AND THE
IMPLEMENTATION AND ADMINISTRATION OF THE COMPACT. PROVISIONS OF THE
COMPACT EXPRESSLY AUTHORIZING OR REQUIRING THE PROMULGATION OF RULES
SHALL NOT BE CONSTRUED TO LIMIT THE COMMISSION’S RULEMAKING AUTHORITY
SOLELY FOR THOSE PURPOSES.
(B) THE PROVISIONS OF THIS COMPACT SHALL BE SEVERABLE AND IF ANY
PHRASE, CLAUSE, SENTENCE, OR PROVISION OF THIS COMPACT IS HELD BY A COURT
OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION TO BE CONTRARY TO THE CONSTITUTION OF ANY
PARTICIPATING STATE, A STATE SEEKING PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT, OR OF
THE UNITED STATES, OR THE APPLICABILITY THEREOF TO ANY GOVERNMENT,
AGENCY, PERSON, OR CIRCUMSTANCE IS HELD TO BE UNCONSTITUTIONAL BY A
COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION, THE VALIDITY OF THE REMAINDER OF THIS
COMPACT AND THE APPLICABILITY THEREOF TO ANY OTHER GOVERNMENT,
AGENCY, PERSON, OR CIRCUMSTANCE SHALL NOT BE AFFECTED THEREBY.
(C) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE
COMMISSION MAY DENY A STATE’S PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT OR, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF SECTION 10(B) OF THIS COMPACT,
TERMINATE A PARTICIPATING STATE’S PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT, IF IT
DETERMINES THAT A CONSTITUTIONAL REQUIREMENT OF A PARTICIPATING STATE
IS A MATERIAL DEPARTURE FROM THE COMPACT. OTHERWISE, IF THIS COMPACT
SHALL BE HELD TO BE CONTRARY TO THE CONSTITUTION OF ANY PARTICIPATING
STATE, THE COMPACT SHALL REMAIN IN FULL FORCE AND EFFECT AS TO THE
REMAINING PARTICIPATING STATES AND IN FULL FORCE AND EFFECT AS TO THE
PARTICIPATING STATE AFFECTED AS TO ALL SEVERABLE MATTERS.
SECTION 13. CONSISTENT EFFECT AND CONFLICT WITH OTHER
STATE LAWS.

HOUSE BILL 45 31
(A) NOTHING HEREIN SHALL PREVENT OR INHIBIT THE ENFORCEMENT OF
ANY OTHER LAW OF A PARTICIPATING STATE THAT IS NOT INCONSISTENT WITH THE
COMPACT.
(B) ANY LAWS, STATUTES, REGULATIONS, OR OTHER LEGAL
REQUIREMENTS IN A PARTICIPATING STATE IN CONFLICT WITH THE COMPACT ARE
SUPERSEDED TO THE EXTENT OF THE CONFLICT.
(C) ALL PERMISSIBLE AGREEMENTS BETWEEN THE COMMISSION AND THE
PARTICIPATING STATES ARE BINDING IN ACCORDANCE WITH THEIR TERMS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is contingent on the
enacting of substantially similar legislation in seven other states. The Maryland
Department of Health shall notify the Department of Legislative Services within 10 days
after seven states have enacted legislation that is substantially similar to this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to Section 2 of this
Act, this Act shall take effect October 1, 2025.